Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 5 Trial Courts
16-2-506. Establishment of judicial districts — Assistant district attorneys general — Criminal investigators — Equity and law courts — Chancery courts.

The state is divided into thirty-two (32) judicial districts composed as follows:

The first judicial district consists of the counties of Carter, Johnson, Unicoi and Washington. The four (4) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in those counties shall continue to serve the first judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1988, the qualified voters of the first judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve the court and part of court designated pursuant to § 16-2-512;

The district attorney general of the first judicial district is entitled to nine (9) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The second judicial district consists of the county of Sullivan. The three (3) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such county shall continue to serve the second judicial district in their respective capacities. Effective September 1, 1984, the law and equity court currently located in Sullivan County shall become a chancery court for the second judicial district and the current law and equity judge shall become a chancellor who on such date shall possess the same jurisdiction, powers and duties and shall receive the same compensation, benefits, emoluments and dignity of office as is required or provided by law for chancellors. In 1984, the qualified voters of the second judicial district shall elect an additional judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part II of the circuit court of such district;

The district attorney general of the second judicial district is entitled to eight (8) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The third judicial district consists of the counties of Greene, Hamblen, Hancock and Hawkins. The three (3) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the third judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1986, the qualified voters of the third judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve the court and part of court designated pursuant to § 16-2-512. In 1990, the qualified voters of the third judicial district shall elect an additional circuit court judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part III of the circuit court of such district;

The district attorney general of the third judicial district is entitled to nine (9) full-time assistant district attorney general positions and three (3) criminal investigator positions;

The fourth judicial district consists of the counties of Cocke, Grainger, Jefferson and Sevier. The three (3) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the fourth judicial district in their respective capacities. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or this part to the contrary, the chancellor currently serving in the fourth judicial district shall also serve the fifth judicial district. As long as the chancellor for the fourth judicial district also serves the fifth judicial district, such chancellor shall be elected by the qualified voters of both such districts and may reside in either district. In 1990, the qualified voters of the fourth judicial district shall elect an additional circuit court judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part III of the circuit court of such district. Effective September 1, 1998, there is created an additional circuit court in the fourth judicial district. At the August 1998 general election, the qualified voters of the fourth judicial district shall elect a person in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve as judge of the circuit court created by this section for an eight-year term;

The district attorney general of the fourth judicial district is entitled to seven (7) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The fifth judicial district consists of the county of Blount. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such county shall continue to serve the fifth judicial district in their respective capacities;

The district attorney general of the fifth judicial district is entitled to five (5) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The sixth judicial district shall consist of the county of Knox. The nine (9) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such county shall continue to serve the sixth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1986, the qualified voters of the sixth judicial district shall elect an additional chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part III of the chancery court of such district;

The district attorney general of the sixth judicial district is entitled to sixteen (16) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The seventh judicial district consists of the county of Anderson. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such county shall continue to serve the seventh judicial district;

The district attorney general of the seventh judicial district is entitled to three (3) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The eighth judicial district consists of the counties of Campbell, Claiborne, Fentress, Scott and Union. The three (3) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the eighth judicial district in their respective capacities;

The district attorney general of the eighth judicial district is entitled to six (6) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The ninth judicial district consists of the counties of Loudon, Meigs, Morgan and Roane. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the ninth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1984, the qualified voters of the ninth judicial district shall elect a chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part I of the chancery court of such district;

The district attorney general of the ninth judicial district is entitled to five (5) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The tenth judicial district consists of the counties of Bradley, McMinn, Monroe and Polk. The four (4) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the tenth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1986, the qualified voters of the tenth judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve the court and part of court designated pursuant to § 16-2-512;

The district attorney general of the tenth judicial district is entitled to ten (10) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The eleventh judicial district consists of the county of Hamilton. The nine (9) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such county shall continue to serve the eleventh judicial district in their respective capacities;

The district attorney general of the eleventh judicial district is entitled to seventeen (17) assistant district attorney general positions and four (4) criminal investigator positions;

The twelfth judicial district consists of the counties of Bledsoe, Franklin, Grundy, Marion, Rhea and Sequatchie. The three (3) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the twelfth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1986, the qualified voters of the twelfth judicial district shall elect an additional judge in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve part III of the circuit court of such district;

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, from September 1, 1984 until September 1, 1990, the chancellor currently residing in the twelfth judicial district shall also serve as chancellor for Coffee and Warren counties in the fourteenth and thirty-first judicial districts, respectively;

The district attorney general of the twelfth judicial district is entitled to eight (8) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The thirteenth judicial district consists of the counties of Clay, Cumberland, DeKalb, Overton, Pickett, Putnam and White. The three (3) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the thirteenth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1984, the qualified voters of the thirteenth judicial district shall elect an additional judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part II of the circuit court of such district. Effective September 1, 1998, there is created a criminal court in the thirteenth judicial district. At the August 1998 general election, the qualified voters of the thirteenth judicial district shall elect a person in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve as judge of the criminal court created by this section for an eight-year term;

The district attorney general of the thirteenth judicial district is entitled to eight (8) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The fourteenth judicial district consists of the county of Coffee. The incumbent trial court judge and district attorney general currently residing in such county shall continue to serve the fourteenth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1990, the qualified voters of the fourteenth judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve the court and part of court designated pursuant to § 16-2-512. The additional judge elected in 1990 shall serve the fourteenth judicial district exclusively and the judge currently residing in such district shall also have the responsibility and duty to assist the judge of the thirty-first judicial district with the judge's docket by interchange;

The district attorney general of the fourteenth judicial district is entitled to three (3) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator positions;

The fifteenth judicial district consists of the counties of Jackson, Macon, Smith, Trousdale and Wilson. The three (3) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the fifteenth judicial district. The present criminal court judge shall continue to serve as judge of the criminal court; the present chancellor shall continue to serve as judge of the chancery court; and the present circuit judge shall continue to serve as judge of the circuit court. Effective September 1, 1998, there is created an additional circuit court in the fifteenth judicial district. At the August 1998 general election, the qualified voters of the fifteenth judicial district shall elect a person in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve as judge of the circuit court created by this section for an eight-year term;

The district attorney general of the fifteenth judicial district is entitled to seven (7) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The sixteenth judicial district consists of the counties of Cannon and Rutherford. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the sixteenth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1984, the qualified voters of the sixteenth judicial district shall elect an additional judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part II of the circuit court of such district;

On May 31, 1993, there is created an additional court in the sixteenth judicial district with the type of such court, type of judge to preside over such court and part of court being designated as provided in § 16-2-512. The position of judge or chancellor for such court is also created on such date and such position shall be filled by appointment as provided by law. The person so appointed shall serve until September 1, 1994, or until such person's successor is elected and qualified. At the August 1994 general election, the qualified voters of the sixteenth judicial district shall elect a judge or chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve the court and part of court created by subdivision (16)(A)(ii);

Effective September 1, 1998, there is created an additional circuit court in the sixteenth judicial district. At the August 1998 general election, the qualified voters of the sixteenth judicial district shall elect a person in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve as judge of the circuit court created by this section for an eight-year term;

Effective September 1, 2018, there is created an additional trial court in the sixteenth judicial district. The type of court, type of judge to preside over the court, and part of court shall be designated as provided in § 16-2-512. The governor shall appoint a person to serve as an additional judge or chancellor, and the person so appointed shall serve in that capacity until September 1, 2020, or until the person's successor is elected and qualified. At the August 2020 general election, the qualified voters of the sixteenth judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor to serve until September 1, 2022, or until the person's successor is elected and qualified. At the August 2022 general election, and every eight (8) years thereafter, the qualified voters of the sixteenth judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor for a full eight-year term;

The district attorney general of the sixteenth judicial district is entitled to ten (10) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The seventeenth judicial district consists of the counties of Bedford, Lincoln, Marshall and Moore. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the seventeenth judicial district in their respective capacities. Effective September 1, 1989, there is created the position of circuit court judge to serve part II of the circuit court of the seventeenth judicial district. Such position shall be filled by appointment of the governor as provided by law and the person so appointed shall serve until September 1, 1990, or until such person's successor is elected and qualified. In 1990, the qualified voters of the seventeenth judicial district shall elect a circuit court judge in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve part II of the circuit court of such district. The judge of part II of such circuit court may be a resident of any county within the seventeenth judicial district and shall serve the entire district;

The district attorney general of the seventeenth judicial district is entitled to five (5) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The eighteenth judicial district consists of the county of Sumner. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such county shall continue to serve the eighteenth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1986, the qualified voters of the eighteenth judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve the court and part of court designated pursuant to § 16-2-512;

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, from September 1, 1984 until September 1, 1990, the circuit court judge currently residing in the eighteenth judicial district shall also serve the nineteenth judicial district;

The district attorney general of the eighteenth judicial district is entitled to seven (7) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The nineteenth judicial district consists of the counties of Montgomery and Robertson. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the nineteenth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1984, the qualified voters of the nineteenth judicial district shall elect an additional judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part I of the circuit court of such district;

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, from September 1, 1984 until September 1, 1988, the chancellor currently residing in the nineteenth judicial district shall also serve as chancellor for Stewart County in the twenty-third judicial district;

The circuit court judge elected in 1984 to serve part I of the circuit court of the nineteenth judicial district shall be a resident of Robertson County but shall serve the entire district. In any subsequent election for part I of such circuit court, the judge may be a resident of any county within the district. Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, from September 1, 1984 until September 1, 1986, the circuit judge for the nineteenth judicial district is authorized to sit by interchange in the eighteenth judicial district when requested to do so by the judges of the eighteenth judicial district. During such two-year period, nothing other than the agreement of the judges involved is necessary to effectuate such an interchange;

Effective September 1, 1984, the law and equity court currently located in Montgomery County shall become part II of the circuit court of the nineteenth judicial district and the current law and equity judge shall become judge of part II of such circuit court. On such date, such law and equity judge shall possess the same jurisdiction, powers and duties and shall receive the same compensation, benefits, emoluments and dignity of office as is required or provided by law for circuit court judges;

In 1990, the qualified voters of the nineteenth judicial district shall elect an additional circuit court judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part III of the circuit court of such district;

Effective September 1, 2015, there is created in the nineteenth judicial district one (1) additional circuit court to be designated as division IV. The governor shall appoint a person to serve as judge of division IV of the circuit court. The person so appointed shall serve in such capacity until September 1, 2016, or until the person's successor is elected and qualified. At the August 2016 general election, the qualified voters of the nineteenth judicial district shall elect, in accordance with § 16-2-505, one (1) person to serve as judge of division IV of the circuit court. The person so elected at the August 2016 general election shall hold office until September 1, 2022, or until the person's successor is elected and qualified. Thereafter, the judge of division IV of the circuit court shall be elected for a full eight-year term;

Effective September 1, 2018, there is created an additional trial court in the nineteenth judicial district. The type of court, type of judge to preside over the court, and part of court shall be designated as provided in § 16-2-512. The governor shall appoint a person to serve as an additional judge or chancellor, and the person so appointed shall serve in that capacity until September 1, 2020, or until the person's successor is elected and qualified. At the August 2020 general election, the qualified voters of the nineteenth judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor to serve until September 1, 2022, or until the person's successor is elected and qualified. At the August 2022 general election, and every eight (8) years thereafter, the qualified voters of the nineteenth judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor for a full eight-year term;

The district attorney general of the nineteenth judicial district is entitled to ten (10) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The twentieth judicial district consists of the county of Davidson. The twelve (12) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such county shall continue to serve the twentieth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1990, the qualified voters of the twentieth judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve the court and part of court designated pursuant to § 16-2-512. In 1998, the qualified voters of the twentieth judicial district shall elect an additional circuit court judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve as judge of division VII of the circuit court of such district. In addition to the jurisdiction of a circuit court judge, the judge of division VII shall have concurrent chancery court jurisdiction and exclusive jurisdiction over the probate of wills and the administration of estates, including the estates of decedents and of wards under guardianships and conservatorships. Effective September 1, 1998, there is created an additional circuit court in the twentieth judicial district. At the August 1998 general election, the qualified voters of the twentieth judicial district shall elect a person in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve as judge of the circuit court created by this section for an eight-year term;

Effective September 1, 2003, there is created in the twentieth judicial district one (1) additional chancery court to be designated as division IV and two (2) additional criminal courts to be designated as division V and division VI. The governor shall appoint a person to serve as chancellor of division IV of the chancery court, a person to serve as judge of division V of the criminal court and a person to serve as judge of division VI of the criminal court. The persons so appointed shall serve in such capacity until September 1, 2004, or until their successors are elected and qualified. At the August 2004 general election, the qualified voters of the twentieth judicial district shall elect, in accordance with § 16-2-505, one (1) person to serve as chancellor of division IV of the chancery court, one (1) person to serve as judge of division V of the criminal court and one (1) person to serve as judge of division VI of the criminal court. The persons so elected at the August 2004 election shall hold office until September 1, 2006, and until their successors are elected and qualified. Thereafter, the chancellor and judges shall be elected for full eight-year terms;

The district attorney general of the twentieth judicial district is entitled to thirty (30) assistant district attorney general positions and five (5) criminal investigator positions;

Until September 1, 2022, the twenty-first judicial district consists of the counties of Hickman, Lewis, Perry and Williamson. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the twenty-first judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1986, the qualified voters of the twenty-first judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve the court and part of court designated pursuant to § 16-2-512. Effective January 1, 1998, there is created an additional circuit court in the twenty-first judicial district. At the August 1998 general election, the qualified voters of the twenty-first district shall elect a person in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve as judge of the circuit court created by this section for an eight-year term;

Effective September 1, 2018, there is created an additional trial court in the twenty-first judicial district. The type of court, type of judge to preside over the court, and part of court shall be designated as provided in § 16-2-512. The governor shall appoint a person to serve as an additional judge or chancellor, and the person so appointed shall serve in that capacity until September 1, 2020, or until the person's successor is elected and qualified. At the August 2020 general election, the qualified voters of the twenty-first judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor to serve until September 1, 2022, at which time the additional trial court shall be transferred to the newly created thirty-second judicial district and presided over by a trial court judge elected by voters of the thirty-second judicial district at the August 2022 general election;

It is the intent of the general assembly by adding an additional trial court in the twenty-first judicial district that the interests of public access to the courts and economy of judicial travel are best served by the presiding judge designating the new trial court created by subdivision (21)(A)(ii) to serve Hickman, Lewis, and Perry counties prior to being transferred to the thirty-second judicial district. Unless otherwise designated by the presiding judge to effectuate the duties enumerated in § 16-2-509(b), the remaining judges shall serve Williamson County;

Effective September 1, 2022, the twenty-first judicial district consists of the county of Williamson. Except as provided in subdivision (21)(A)(iii), the incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in the county shall continue to serve the twenty-first judicial district in their respective capacities until September 1, 2022. At the August 2022 general election, and every eight (8) years thereafter, the qualified voters of Williamson County shall elect four (4) trial court judges to fill the positions created by subdivision (21)(A)(i) for a full eight-year term;

Effective September 1, 2022, the additional trial court created by subdivision (21)(A)(ii) shall be transferred to the thirty-second judicial district;

The district attorney general of the twenty-first judicial district is entitled to seven (7) assistant district attorney general positions, one (1) criminal investigator position, and one (1) additional assistant district attorney general position; provided, that the funding for such additional assistant district attorney general position is provided exclusively by the municipal and county governments that comprise the twenty-first judicial district;

The twenty-second judicial district consists of the counties of Giles, Lawrence, Maury and Wayne. The three (3) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the twenty-second judicial district in their respective capacities. Effective September 1, 1998, there is created an additional circuit court in the twenty-second judicial district. At the August 1998 general election, the qualified voters of the twenty-second judicial district shall elect a person in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve as judge of the circuit court created by this section for an eight-year term;

The district attorney general of the twenty-second judicial district is entitled to eight (8) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions;

The twenty-third judicial district consists of the counties of Cheatham, Dickson, Houston, Humphreys and Stewart. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the twenty-third judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1988, the qualified voters of the twenty-third judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve the court and part of court designated pursuant to § 16-2-512;

The district attorney general of the twenty-third judicial district is entitled to seven (7) assistant district attorney general positions and two (2) criminal investigator positions. The fifth assistant district attorney general position shall not be filled unless full funding for the position is secured from local, federal or other funding sources apart from state appropriations;

The twenty-fourth judicial district consists of the counties of Benton, Carroll, Decatur, Hardin and Henry. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the twenty-fourth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1984, the qualified voters of the twenty-fourth judicial district shall elect an additional judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part II of the circuit court of such district;

The district attorney general of the twenty-fourth judicial district is entitled to five (5) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The twenty-fifth judicial district consists of the counties of Fayette, Hardeman, Lauderdale, McNairy and Tipton. The three (3) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the twenty-fifth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1990, the qualified voters of the twenty-fifth judicial district shall elect an additional judge or chancellor in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve the court and part of court designated pursuant to § 16-2-512;

The district attorney general of the twenty-fifth judicial district is entitled to nine (9) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The twenty-sixth judicial district consists of the counties of Chester, Henderson and Madison. The three (3) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the twenty-sixth judicial district in their respective capacities. Effective September 1, 1998, there is created an additional circuit court in the twenty-sixth judicial district. At the August 1998 general election, the qualified voters of the twenty-sixth judicial district shall elect a person in accordance with § 16-2-505, to serve as judge of the circuit court created by this section for an eight-year term;

The district attorney general of the twenty-sixth judicial district is entitled to seven (7) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The twenty-seventh judicial district consists of the counties of Obion and Weakley. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the twenty-seventh judicial district in their respective capacities;

The district attorney general of the twenty-seventh judicial district is entitled to three (3) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The twenty-eighth judicial district consists of the counties of Crockett, Gibson and Haywood. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the twenty-eighth judicial district in their respective capacities;

Effective September 1, 1984, the law and equity court currently located in Gibson County shall become a chancery court for the twenty-eighth judicial district and the current law and equity judge shall become a chancellor who on such date shall possess the same jurisdiction, powers and duties and shall receive the same compensation, benefits, emoluments and dignity of office as is required or provided by law for chancellors;

The district attorney general of the twenty-eighth judicial district is entitled to five (5) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

The twenty-ninth judicial district consists of the counties of Dyer and Lake. The two (2) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the twenty-ninth judicial district in their respective capacities. Juvenile jurisdiction in Dyer County shall be in the court of general sessions as provided in §§ 37-1-102 and 37-1-203, unless such jurisdiction is vested in another court by law or private act;

Effective April 15, 1986, part II of the circuit court of the twenty-ninth judicial district shall become part I of the chancery court of such district and the current judge of part II of such circuit court shall become chancellor of part I of the chancery court of such district. On such date, such chancellor shall possess the same jurisdiction, powers and duties and shall receive the same compensation, benefits, emoluments and dignity of office as is required or provided by law for chancellors. This chancellor shall have concurrent jurisdiction with the circuit court of this district;

The district attorney general of the twenty-ninth judicial district is entitled to three (3) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

Effective September 1, 1984, there is created the position of secretary for the chancellor of part I of the chancery court of the twenty-ninth judicial district and such chancellor is authorized to employ a person to fill such position in accordance with § 16-2-505(c);

The thirtieth judicial district is composed of the county of Shelby. The nineteen (19) incumbent trial court judges and the district attorney general currently residing in such county shall continue to serve the thirtieth judicial district in their respective capacities. In 1984, the qualified voters of the thirtieth judicial district shall elect an additional judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part IX of the circuit court of such district. In 1990, the qualified voters of the thirtieth judicial district shall elect one (1) additional criminal court judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve part IX of the criminal court of such district. The board of commissioners of Shelby County shall furnish all books other than those provided by the administrative director of the courts and other necessary supplies for the judge to be elected in 1990. On June 6, 1995, there is created an additional criminal court in the thirtieth judicial district. The court shall be Part X of the criminal court of such district. The position shall be filled by appointment as provided by law. The person so appointed shall serve until September 1, 1996, or until such person's successor is elected and qualified. At the August 1996 general election, the qualified voters of the thirtieth judicial district shall elect a criminal court judge in accordance with § 16-2-505 to serve Part X of the court;

The district attorney general of the thirtieth judicial district is entitled to forty-four (44) assistant district attorney general positions and thirteen (13) criminal investigator positions; and

The thirty-first judicial district consists of the counties of Van Buren and Warren. The incumbent trial court judge currently residing in such counties shall continue to serve the thirty-first judicial district. The judge residing in the thirty-first judicial district shall also have the responsibility and duty to assist the judge of the fourteenth judicial district by interchange with such judge's docket;

Effective September 1, 1990, there is created the position of district attorney general for the thirty-first judicial district. At the regular August election in 1990, the qualified voters of the thirty-first judicial district shall elect a person to the position of district attorney general for a full eight-year term. The person elected to such position shall possess the same qualifications, powers and duties and shall receive the same compensation, payable in the same manner, benefits, emoluments and dignity of office as is required or provided by law for other district attorneys general;

Effective July 1, 1989, there are created two (2) secretarial positions for the district attorney general of the thirty-first judicial district. Such district attorney general shall select a suitable person to fill one (1) position and such person shall receive the same compensation, payable in the same manner, as is provided by law for the secretary of other district attorneys general. The secretary shall perform such duties as may be assigned by such district attorney general. Such district attorney general shall transfer all authority and funding concerning the other secretarial position to the district attorney general for the fourth judicial district who shall select a suitable person to fill the other position, and such person shall receive the same compensation, payable in the same manner, as is provided by law for the secretary of other district attorneys general. The secretary shall perform such duties as may be assigned by the district attorney general for the fourth judicial district;

The district attorney general of the thirty-first judicial district is entitled to three (3) assistant district attorney general positions and one (1) criminal investigator position;

On September 1, 1990, the office space and all state-owned furniture, equipment, supplies, books and other such office property located in the Warren County courthouse and currently being used by the district attorney general of the fourteenth judicial district, or by one (1) of the district attorney general's assistants or investigators, shall be transferred for the use of the district attorney of the thirty-first judicial district. On and after such date, all such office space and other office property located in the Warren County courthouse shall become the space for and property of the office of district attorney general for the thirty-first judicial district. Nothing contained herein shall be construed as prohibiting such district attorney general from also establishing an office in the other county comprising the thirty-first judicial district;

By September 1, 1990, all records, files, papers and other official documents pertaining to any pending or completed case arising out of any of the counties comprising the thirty-first judicial district shall be transferred to and become the property of the office of district attorney general for the thirty-first judicial district;

Notwithstanding any other law or this subdivision (31) to the contrary, if a vacancy occurs in the office of the district attorney general currently serving the thirty-first judicial district, the governor shall appoint a suitable person to serve as district attorney general for such district. The person so appointed shall possess all of the qualifications required by law for district attorneys general and shall serve until September 1, 1990, or until the district attorney general to be elected by the voters of the thirty-first judicial district pursuant to this subdivision (31)(B) is elected and qualified; and
